Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-6225
Board; review
technical committee report; report to director.

The
board shall receive reports from the technical committees and shall meet to
review and discuss each report. The board shall apply the criteria established
in sections 71-6221 to 71-6223 and compile its own report, including its findings
and recommendations, and submit such report, together with the committee report,
to the director. The recommendation of the board shall be developed in a manner
consistent with subsection (4) of section 71-6224.

Laws 1985, LB 407, § 25;

Laws 1988, LB 384, § 11;

Laws 2012, LB834, § 20.